Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 51

State Budget and Appropriations

9-4-5101. Items set forth in budget.

The budget of the state government shall present a complete financial plan for the ensuing fiscal year, which plan shall set forth all proposed expenditures for the administration, operation, and maintenance of the several departments, institutions, offices and agencies of the state government, the interest and debt redemption charges during the fiscal year.

The budget shall also present proposals for capital projects to be undertaken or completed during the ensuing year, and the means of financing such projects.

In addition thereto, the budget shall set forth the anticipated revenues of the state government and any other means of financing the expenditures proposed for the ensuing fiscal year.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.17; Acts 1969, ch. 12, § 1; 1970, ch. 434, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-601; T.C.A., §9-6-101; Acts 2002, ch. 510, § 1; 2013, ch. 243, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which deleted subsection (d), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

Cross-References. Budget powers, §4-3-1006.

Establishment of budget section in department of finance and administration, §4-3-1003.

9-4-5102. Performance-based program budgeting.

It is the intent of the general assembly that, to the extent practicable, the budget of the state government shall be prepared using performance data and other relevant program measures. The goals for such budget shall include:

For each budget unit, detailed statements identifying all substantial aspects of agency operations, priorities, and activities, to specifically include:

A description of the objective or objectives of each program;

A description of the activity or activities which are intended to accomplish each objective;

Indicators of quantity and quality of performance of these activities; and

The level of effort required to accomplish each activity in terms of funds and personnel; and

A summary statement incorporating the information in subdivision (1) for the current and one (1) prior fiscal year for each budget unit and detailed statements of the sources of funding for all fiscal years presented.

Acts 1977, ch. 457, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-616; Acts 1984, ch. 771, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-102; Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 6; 2013, ch. 243, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5103. Estimates by departments — Classification of expenditures.

On or before December 1 of each year, all departments, offices, and agencies of the state government shall prepare on blanks furnished to them by the commissioner of finance and administration, and submit to such officer, estimates of their expenditure requirements for the next fiscal year compared with the corresponding figures of the last completed fiscal year and estimated figures for the current fiscal year. The expenditure estimates shall be classified to set forth the data by funds, organization units, character and objects of expenditure; the organization units may be subclassified by function and activities, or in any other manner at the discretion of the commissioner.

Any state agency subject to part 56 of this chapter shall include with its budget request the performance measures and standards required by § 9-4-5606.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.19; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1969, ch. 12, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-602; T.C.A. §9-6-103; Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 3; 2013, ch. 243, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (b), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

Cross-References. State schools, §§49-1-302,49-50-1001,49-50-1002.

9-4-5104. Revenue estimates.

On or before January 1 of each year, the commissioner of finance and administration shall prepare revenue estimates for the current fiscal year and for the next fiscal year for inclusion in the budget. The revenue estimates shall be classified so as to show the receipts by funds, organization units, and sources of income.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.19; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1969, ch. 12, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-603; T.C.A. §9-6-104.

9-4-5105. Review of estimates — Transmittal of budget document — Governor's power to amend the budget not restricted or prohibited.

The governor, with the assistance of the commissioner of finance and administration, shall review the estimates, altering, revising, increasing, or decreasing the items of the estimates as the governor may deem necessary in view of the needs of the various spending agencies and the total anticipated revenues of the state government during the ensuing fiscal year.

The commissioner, at the instance of the governor, shall then prepare a budget document in the form required by this chapter, and the governor shall transmit such document in printed form to the general assembly prior to February 1, each year unless the general assembly, by joint resolution, authorizes transmittal by a later date; provided, that a governor in the first year of such governor's term in office is required to transmit such budget document in printed form to the general assembly prior to March 1 of that year, unless the general assembly, by joint resolution, authorizes transmittal by a later date.

Nothing contained in § 16-3-803(l) or any other law shall be construed to restrict or prohibit the governor's authority to revise the budget, submitted pursuant to §§ 16-3-803(l) and 9-4-5103, for maintenance and operation of the state court system, and such budget or revised budget shall be included within the budget document required by this section.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 20; 1945, ch. 10, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.20; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1969, ch. 12, §§ 5, 6; 1975, ch. 27, § 1; 1979, ch. 218, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-604; Acts 1992, ch. 896, § 2; T.C.A. §9-6-105.

9-4-5106. Form and contents of budget document — General appropriations bill.

The budget document, presenting the financial plan of the state government for the next fiscal year, shall be set up in three (3) parts, the nature and contents of which are as follows:

Part 1 shall consist of a budget message by the governor which shall outline the financial policy of the state government for the ensuing fiscal year, describing in connection therewith the important features of the financial plan; it shall also embrace a general budget summary setting forth the aggregate figures of the budget in such manner as to show the balances, relations between the total proposed expenditures and the total anticipated revenues, together with the other means of financing the budget for the next fiscal year, contrasted with the corresponding figures for the last completed fiscal year and for the fiscal year in progress. The general budget summary shall be supported by explanatory schedules or statements, classifying the expenditures contained therein by organization units, objects and funds and the income by organization units, sources, and funds;

Part 1 also shall include a schedule on tax exemptions, identifying, to the extent practicable, all exemptions from state taxes and estimating the amount of revenue which would be collected by the state in the ensuing fiscal year if the exemptions were not to exist. The schedule shall include an estimate for each such exemption. The estimates of such exemptions shall be based upon the revenue estimates included in the budget document;

Part 2 shall embrace the detailed budget estimates both of expenditures and revenues as provided in this chapter; it also shall include performance measures and standards required by § 9-4-5606; it shall also include a statement of the bonded indebtedness of the state government, showing the debt redemption requirements scheduled over the fiscal years until the final date of retirement, the net and gross debt of the state, and the condition of the sinking funds; in addition thereto, it shall contain any statements relative to the financial plan which the governor may deem desirable, or which may be required by the general assembly; and

Part 3 shall embrace complete drafts of the budget bills, that is, the legislative measures required to give legal sanction to the financial plan when adopted by the general assembly. These bills shall include an appropriation bill, authorizing, by spending agencies and by funds, all expenditures of the state government for the next fiscal year, and such other bills as may be required to provide the revenues necessary to finance the budget. The governor shall submit these bills for introduction in both houses of the general assembly no later than fourteen (14) days after the budget document is transmitted or by the general bill cut-off date in the respective houses, whichever is later.

The capital budget, to be included in part 2 of the budget document, shall contain funding for all capital outlay. Funding for all capital improvement projects of whatever amount and funding for each capital maintenance project of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more shall be specified by project, by affected spending agency, and by funding sources, including state current funds, bonds, and other revenue. Funding for each capital maintenance project of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be specified in such detail in the budget document as the governor shall determine.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.18; Acts 1969, ch. 12, §§ 7-10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-605; Acts 1992, ch. 896, § 3; 1993, ch. 66, § 12; T.C.A. §9-6-106; Acts 2002, ch. 510, § 2; 2002, ch. 875, §§ 4, 7; 2012, ch. 1026, § 6; 2013, ch. 243, §§ 6, 19, 20; 2013, ch. 454, §§ 16, 40.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 243, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Governmental Accountability Act of 2013.”

9-4-5107. Direct and continuing appropriations.

By authorizing the issuance of debt that is not a liability of the state and the payment of debt service thereon by the state school bond authority in title 49, by the local development authority in title 4, by the housing development agency in title 13, and by the state veterans' homes board in title 58, the general assembly intends that such authorizations constitute:

With respect to each debt issuer listed above, a direct and continuing appropriation to that debt issuer of its earnings, revenues or other assets for expenditures authorized by or pursuant to the respective enabling legislation and the authority to expend those funds in accordance with or pursuant to such legislation; and

With respect to any public higher education entity whose contracts or agreements with the state school bond authority support the payment of such debt issuer's debt service, a direct and continuing appropriation to that entity of its earnings, revenues or other assets pledged or governed by such contracts or agreements and the authority to expend those funds in accordance with or pursuant to the respective contracts or agreements.

Such funds are hereby appropriated on a direct and continuing basis to each debt issuer listed in subsection (a) and to each public higher education entity described in subsection (a) for such purposes.

For purposes of this section, the term “revenues” includes amounts allowable, without regard to any offset, to any such debt issuers from the federal government with respect to qualified bonds.

Acts 2001, ch. 264, § 2; 2010, ch. 1117, § 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Even if the general assembly fails to adopt a budget, including a continuation budget, by June 30, the Tennessee state school bond authority, the Tennessee local development authority, the Tennessee housing development authority, and the Tennessee state veterans' homes board may continue to pay debt service from their revenues and expend their revenues, OAG 02-034, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/15/02).

9-4-5108. Form of appropriation bill — Capital projects — General legislation — Contents of title.

The general appropriations bill, provided for in § 9-4-5106, shall be drawn in such form as to authorize only lump sum appropriations to meet the expenditure needs of the various spending agencies of the state government for the next fiscal year.

For the expenses of operation and maintenance in each department, division, institution, office, or other agency, there shall be not more than two (2) appropriations, one (1) for personal services and one (1) for other expenses, which shall be allotted before becoming available for expenditure as provided in §§ 9-4-5109 — 9-4-5113.

Appropriations for capital improvement and capital maintenance projects shall be specified by state agency in lump sums consistent with capital improvement and maintenance projects detailed in the budget document.

The appropriation bill shall not contain any provisions of general legislation.

The title of any bill making appropriations from the treasury shall include the phrase, “This act makes appropriations for (here insert the object).” The title shall also state whether the act shall be for a limited period of time or for an indefinite period. If it is for a limited period of time, the title shall state that time period.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the appropriations bill may specify incentives or disincentives relative to performance-based budgeting.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.21; Acts 1969, ch. 12, §§ 11, 12; 1977, ch. 393, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-606; T.C.A. §9-6-108; Acts 2002, ch. 875, § 5; 2012, ch. 1026, § 7.

Cross-References. Origin and frame of bills, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 17.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of Acts 1991, ch. 509, § 41, item 16, OAG 91-78, 1991 Tenn. AG LEXIS 89 (8/27/91).

Act authorizing constituent accountability funds required appropriations titling, OAG 99-040, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 59 (2/24/99).

Unless it is expressly forbidden by statute, state agencies, generally, and public health and safety and various administrative agencies, in particular, may continue to carry out their duties and responsibilities regardless of whether an appropriations act has been enacted, OAG 00-083, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (5/4/00).

Whether any particular official's salary may be paid if an appropriations act has not been enacted would depend on whether the statute setting that official's salary and authorizing its payment itself constitutes an appropriation, OAG 00-083, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (5/4/00).

2013 Appropriations Act provision relating to York Institute. OAG 13-75, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (9/26/13).

9-4-5109. Amendment of appropriation recommendations.

The governor may amend or supplement the governor's recommendations as to the general appropriations bill while it is before the general assembly.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.23; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-607; T.C.A. §9-6-109.

9-4-5110. Work program — Allotments.

Not later than June 1 of each year, the governor shall require the head of each department, office, and agency of the state government to submit to the commissioner of finance and administration a work program for the ensuing fiscal year, such program to include all appropriations made by the general assembly to such department, office, or agency for its operation and maintenance and for capital projects, and to show the requested allotments of the appropriations by quarters for the entire fiscal year. The governor, with the assistance of the commissioner, shall review the requested allotments with respect to the work program of each department, office, or agency, and shall, if the governor deems it necessary, revise, alter, or change such allotments before approving them. The aggregate of such allotments shall not exceed the total appropriations made by the general assembly to the department, office, or agency for the fiscal year in question. The commissioner shall transmit a copy of the allotments as approved by the governor to the head of each department, office, or agency concerned. The commissioner shall thereupon authorize all expenditures to be made from the appropriations on the basis of such allotments and not otherwise.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives or, by joint delegation, their director of legislative administration; the chief justice or, by delegation, the administrative director of the courts; the attorney general and reporter; the secretary of state; the comptroller of the treasury; and state treasurer are authorized to revise their respective budgets and personnel authorizations within the appropriations made in the appropriations act and to submit those revised summaries to the commissioner of finance and administration, who shall approve the work program of those agencies, if within the amounts appropriated.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.22; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-608; T.C.A. §9-6-110; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 33.

9-4-5111. Reserve allotment.

In order to provide some degree of flexibility to meet emergencies arising during each fiscal year in the expenditures for operation and maintenance of the various departments, offices and agencies of state government, the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the governor, may require the head of each department, office, or agency, in making the original allotments, to set aside a reserve, the exact amount of which shall be determined by the commissioner of finance and administration, of the total amount appropriated to the department, office, or agency.

At any time during the fiscal year, this reserve or any portion of it may be returned to the appropriation to which it belongs and may be added to any one (1) or more of the allotments; provided, that the commissioner deems such action necessary, and any unused portion thereof shall remain at the end of the fiscal year as an unexpended balance of appropriation. Any unexpended and unencumbered balance of allotments at the end of each quarter shall be credited to the reserve set up for the fiscal year.

During fiscal year 2020-2021, before requiring each head to set aside a reserve pursuant to subsection (a) or otherwise reserving allotments pursuant to this section, the commissioner of finance and administration shall submit written notice of the proposed reserve allotment to the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives and to the chairs of the finance, ways and means committees of the senate and house of representatives. No such allotments shall be reserved until the speakers and chairs have acknowledged in writing receipt of such written notice. When submitted, a copy of the notice shall be provided to the fiscal review committee executive director and the office of legislative budget analysis directors for information purposes. A proposed reserve allotment shall not be acknowledged by the chairs during a time that the general assembly is in regular, annual session until each finance, ways and means committee has held a hearing on the proposed allotment, or the committees have held a joint hearing.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.22; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-609; T.C.A. §9-6-111; Acts 2020, ch. 759, § 14.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 759, § 18. June 30, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. Creation of reserves, OAG 93-06, 1993, Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/14/93).

9-4-5112. Revision of work programs.

The head of any department, office, or agency of the state government, whenever such head deems it necessary by reason of changed conditions, may revise the work program of such head's department, office, or agency at the beginning of any quarter during the fiscal year, and submit such revised program to the commissioner of finance and administration, with such head's request for a revision of the allotments of the remaining quarters of that fiscal year. If, upon such reexamination of the work program, the commissioner, with the approval of the governor, decides to grant the request for the revision of the allotments, the same procedure, so far as it relates to review, approval, and control, shall be followed as in the making of the original allotments.

Revisions to the work programs of the secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, and state treasurer shall be approved by the commissioner of finance and administration if submitted in accordance with the appropriations act, if within the amounts appropriated, and if submitted with the concurrence of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.22; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-610; T.C.A. §9-6-112; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 34.

9-4-5113. Certification of funds to meet obligations.

No department or officer under such department shall enter into any contract, agreement, or obligation, involving the expenditure of money, unless the commissioner of finance and administration shall first certify that there is a balance in the appropriation from which such obligation is required to be paid, that is not otherwise encumbered to pay obligations previously incurred.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to the general assembly, state court system, attorney general and reporter, district attorneys general, district public defenders, office of the post-conviction defender, secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, and the state treasurer; provided, however, that the chief administrative officer for each of these agencies shall ensure, before entering into any contract, agreement, or obligation involving the expenditure of money, that there is a balance in the appropriation from which such obligation is required to be paid that is not otherwise encumbered to pay obligations previously incurred.

All funds appropriated to the secretary of state, comptroller of the treasury, and state treasurer shall be administered in a ministerial capacity by the department of finance and administration in accordance with budgets and any revisions thereto of the respective entities for which such appropriations are made.

Acts 1923, ch. 7, § 17; Code 1932, § 279; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.22; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-611; T.C.A. §9-6-113; Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 24; 2014, ch. 917, § 3.

9-4-5114. Obligations after fiscal year prohibited — Allotments required.

No appropriation shall confer authority to incur an obligation after the termination of the fiscal year to which it relates. No appropriation to any state department, institution, office, or agency, excepting the general assembly, shall become available for expenditure until allotted upon the basis of a work program, duly approved by the governor, as provided in §§9-4-5110 —9-4-5112.

Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 25; C. Supp. 1950, § 255.25; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-612; T.C.A. §9-6-114.

Cross-References. Appropriation of public moneys, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

Attorney General Opinions. As a general matter, absent the enactment of an appropriations bill for a fiscal year, there is no authority in most circumstances for the state to spend money, whether generated by the state's own taxing powers or received from other sources such as the federal government, OAG 00-083, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (5/4/00).

9-4-5115. State funds received by local government unit not to be expended for costs of lawsuit against state in which local government unit is plaintiff.

No state funds received by a local government unit shall be expended to pay attorney's fees, court costs, or other expenses attributable to a lawsuit filed against the state, a state agency, or a state official in which the local government unit is named as a plaintiff. If the state, agency, or official prevails in the lawsuit, then the department of finance and administration shall deduct from the local government unit's allocation of state-shared taxes, in the case of a city or county, or allocation of funds based on the Basic Education Program (BEP) formula, in the case of an LEA, such sum or part of such sum to recover attorney's fees, court costs, and other expenses attributable to defending the state in the lawsuit.

As used in this section, “local government unit” means a county, municipality, or local education agency (LEA) as defined in § 49-1-103.

Acts 2015, ch. 425, § 4.

9-4-5116. Abortion funding.

No state funds shall be expended to perform abortions. The limitations established in this section shall not apply to an abortion if:

The pregnancy is the result of an act of rape or incest; or

In the case where a woman suffers from a physical disorder, physical injury, or physical illness, including a life-endangering physical condition caused by or arising from the pregnancy itself, that would, as certified by a physician, place the woman in danger of death unless the abortion is performed.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 67.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Collateral References.

Validity of state statutes and regulations limiting or restricting public funding for abortions sought by indigent women. 118 A.L.R.5th 463.

9-4-5117. Certification of board fees — Regulatory fees.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, upon receiving from the commissioner of finance and administration the approved work program, as provided in § 9-4-5110, for the department of commerce and insurance, division of regulatory boards, and department of health, division of health-related boards, the commissioners of those departments shall certify by October 31 to the commissioner of finance and administration and, as applicable, to the director of the division of regulatory boards, as defined in § 4-3-1304, and to the director of the division of health-related boards, as defined in § 63-1-131, the total amount of board fee revenue required by each board for the current fiscal year, based on the approved work program. The commissioners of commerce and insurance and of health shall include the direct costs allocated to each board for the then-current fiscal year and shall reduce the certified amount by the amount of any excess fees from the immediately preceding two-year period, it being the legislative intent that fees and expenditures should be equal over a two-year period for each board, as provided in § 4-29-121. Such certification shall not preclude the retention of any board fee revenue estimated to be required for support of each board's operation for the then-current two-year period.

The fee established pursuant to the amounts certified as set forth in subsection (a) shall be designated as the board fee.

In addition to the board fee, each regulatory board shall also assess a state regulatory fee in such amount as is set each year in the general appropriations act. The state regulatory fee shall be in lieu of any allocation of indirect costs that would otherwise be allocated to such boards.

Within sixty (60) days after receiving the certification of the amount of fees required by each board, the director of the division of regulatory boards and the director of the division of health-related boards shall provide the commissioner of finance and administration with an official estimate of fees to be collected by each board for the fiscal year.

To the extent the estimate of fees for an individual board is less than the certified amount, the appropriation for that board shall be reduced in the amount of the deficiency, and the commissioner of finance and administration is directed to reduce the budget of the board accordingly.

The general assembly may supplement any board's appropriation from fee revenue by an appropriation of tax revenue by making a specific appropriation of such tax revenue in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1989, ch. 523, § 1; 2012, ch. 714, § 1; 2013, ch. 454, §§ 10-13; T.C.A. §4-3-1011.

9-4-5118. State funds not to be expended to pay municipality’s public indebtedness.

No state funds shall be expended to pay the public indebtedness of any municipality; provided, however, that this subsection (a) does not preclude any municipality from utilizing its allocation of state-shared taxes for the purpose of paying its public indebtedness.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Public indebtedness” means the bonds, notes or other evidence of indebtedness lawfully issued or assumed;

“State departmental revenues” means:

Earnings or charges for goods or services; or

Donations, contributions or participation by political subdivisions, foundations, corporations, firms or persons;

“State funds” means state departmental revenues or state revenues;

“State revenues” means the proceeds collected from taxes, licenses, fees, fines, forfeitures or other imposts laid specifically by law for state government; and

“State-shared taxes” means taxes imposed and collected by the state pursuant to law and allocated by law among units of local government.

This section shall not be construed as limiting the authority provided in chapter 13, part 2 of this title or chapter 21, part 7 of this title.

Acts 2014, ch. 853, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 853 took effect on April 29, 2014.

9-4-5119. Prohibited use of state funds by University of Tennessee — Use of funds in budget of office of diversity and inclusion.

State funds shall not be expended by the University of Tennessee to promote the use of gender neutral pronouns, to promote or inhibit the celebration of religious holidays, or to fund or support sex week.(b) All funds in the budget of the office for diversity and inclusion at the University of Tennessee, Knoxville, for fiscal year 2016-2017, shall be reallocated in the university's budget and used by the university solely for scholarships to be awarded through a minority engineering scholarship program. Any funds from the budget of the office for diversity and inclusion that are not used for minority engineering scholarships in fiscal year 2016-2017 shall remain in the scholarship program for use in future fiscal years.

Acts 2016, ch. 1066, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2016, ch. 1066, § 1 provided that the act take effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. The act was returned without the governor's signature and became effective on May 20, 2016, under the provisions of Tenn. Const., art. III, § 18.